Utah statutes.
53A-1a-106.   School district and individual school powers.
(1)  In order to acquire and develop the characteristics listed in Section
53A-1a-104, each school district and each public school within its respective
district shall implement a comprehensive system of accountability in which
students advance through public schools by demonstrating competency in
required skills and mastery of required knowledge through the use of diverse
assessment instruments such as authentic and criterion referenced tests,
projects, and portfolios.
(2) (a)  Each school district and public school shall:
(i)  develop and implement programs integrating technology into the
curriculum, instruction, and student assessment;
(ii)  provide for teacher and parent involvement in policymaking at the school
site;
(iii)  implement a public school choice program to give parents, students, and
teachers greater flexibility in designing and choosing among programs with
different focuses through schools within the same district and other
districts, subject to space availability, demographics, and legal and
performance criteria;
(iv)  establish strategic planning at both the district and school level and
site-based decision making programs at the school level;
(v)  provide opportunities for each student to acquire and develop academic
and occupational knowledge, skills, and abilities;
(vi)  participate in ongoing research and development projects primarily at
the school level aimed at improving the quality of education within the
system; and
(vii)  involve business and industry in the education process through the
establishment of partnerships with the business community at the district and
school level.
(b) (i)  Each local school board, in consultation with school personnel,
parents, and school community councils or similar entities shall establish
policies to provide for the effective implementation of a personalized student
education plan (SEP) or student education/occupation plan (SEOP) for each
student at the school site.
(ii)  The policies shall include guidelines and expectations for:
(A)  recognizing the student's accomplishments, strengths, and progress
towards meeting student achievement standards as defined in U-PASS;
(B)  planning, monitoring, and managing education and career development; and
(C)  involving students, parents, and school personnel in preparing and
implementing SEPs and SEOPs.
(iii)  A parent may request conferences with school personnel in addition to
SEP or SEOP conferences established by local school board policy.
(iv)  Time spent during the school day to implement SEPs and SEOPs is
considered part of the school term referred to in Subsection 53A-17a-103(5).
(3)  A school district or public school may submit proposals to modify or
waive rules or policies of a supervisory authority within the public education
system in order to acquire or develop the characteristics listed in Section
53A-1a-104.
(4) (a)  Each school district and public school shall make an annual report to
its patrons on its activities under this section.
(b)  The reporting process shall involve participation from teachers, parents,
and the community at large in determining how well the district or school is
performing.
